Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-1121
Trust; validity.

No trust created or any interest in such trust shall be invalidated by any existing law or rule against perpetuities, accumulations, or suspension of the power of alienation, and such trust and any interest may continue for such time as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes for which it was created.

Laws 1986, LB 643, § 21.